Tennessee, session 114, HB2042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 8, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A local board of education or public charter school governing body may
implement a program that offers a reward to a person who provides an accurate report
of the illegal presence of a firearm on school property. The rewards offered in a program
created pursuant to this section may be tailored to each school's unique student
population, and tailored to work with schools, parents, and the community to encourage
credible reports of the illegal presence of a firearm on school property. A local board of
education or public charter school governing body that implements a program pursuant
to this section shall ensure that the program complies with state law.
(b) A program implemented pursuant to this section may be funded through
private donations.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2042
009737
- 1 -